Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.695

County regulation of family day-care centers—Twelve-month pilot projects.

(1) Notwithstanding RCW 74.15.030, counties with a population of three thousand or less may adopt and enforce ordinances and regulations as provided in this section for family day-care providers as defined in *RCW 74.15.020(1)(f) as a twelve-month pilot project. Before a county may regulate family day-care providers in accordance with this section, it shall adopt ordinances and regulations that address, at a minimum, the following: (a) The size, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises; (b) the plan of operation; (c) the character, suitability, and competence of a family day-care provider and other persons associated with a family day-care provider directly responsible for the care of children served; (d) the number of qualified persons required to render care; (e) the provision of necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision, and discipline; (f) the physical, mental, and social well-being of children served; (g) educational and recreational opportunities for children served; and (h) the maintenance of records pertaining to children served.

(2) The county shall notify the department of social and health services in writing sixty days prior to adoption of the family day-care regulations required pursuant to this section. The transfer of jurisdiction shall occur when the county has notified the department in writing of the effective date of the regulations, and shall be limited to a period of twelve months from the effective date of the regulations. Regulation by counties of family day-care providers as provided in this section shall be administered and enforced by those counties. The department shall not regulate these activities nor shall the department bear any civil liability under chapter 74.15 RCW for the twelve-month pilot period. Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to any county that is in the process of adopting the regulations required by this section, and after the regulations become effective.

(3) Any county regulating family day-care providers pursuant to this section shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the outcome of the pilot project upon expiration of the twelve-month pilot period. The report shall include the ordinances and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and a description of how those ordinances and regulations address the specific areas of regulation identified in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2005 c 509 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.532, 74.15.031.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 265, Laws of 2006, deleted the definition of "family day-care provider" in RCW 74.15.020 and created it in RCW 43.215.010. RCW 43.215.010 was recodified as RCW 43.216.010 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date—2005 c 509: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 17, 2005]." [ 2005 c 509 s 2.]